Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.130

Payment upon disablement in line of duty.

(1) Any firefighter who shall become disabled as a result of the performance of his or her duty or duties as defined in this chapter, may be retired at the expiration of six months from the date of his or her disability, upon his or her written request filed with his or her retirement board. The board may upon such request being filed, consult such medical advice as it sees fit, and may have the applicant examined by such physicians as it deems desirable. If from the reports of such physicians the board finds the applicant capable of performing his or her duties in the fire department, the board may refuse to recommend his or her retirement.

(2) If the board deems it for the good of the fire department or the pension fund, it may recommend the applicant's retirement without any request therefor by him or her, after giving him or her a thirty days' notice. Upon his or her retirement he or she shall be paid a monthly disability pension in [an] amount equal to one-half of his or her monthly salary at date of retirement, but which shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars a month. If he or she recovers from his or her disability he or she shall thereupon be restored to active service, with the same rank he or she held when he or she retired.

(3) If the firefighter dies during disability and not as a result thereof, RCW 41.16.160 shall apply.

[ 2007 c 218 s 28; 1959 c 5 s 7; 1957 c 82 s 7. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 3, part; 1929 c 86 s 3, part; 1919 c 196 s 5, part; 1909 c 50 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.